Massachusetts, session 194th, H3543.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 25 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
adding after Section 23 the following section:-
Section 24, (a) As used in this section, the following words shall have the following
meanings unless the context clearly requires otherwise:-
“Ambient geothermal energy”, geothermal energy of less than 80 degrees Fahrenheit
found at depths of 2,000 feet or less in the earth.
“Anthropogenic geothermal energy”, geothermal energy of less than 80 degrees
Fahrenheit found at depths of 2000 feet or less and originating from human-caused climate
change.
''Geothermal energy'', thermal energy that is sourced from (i) the ground, including
bedrock and the earth beneath the bedrock, (ii) the surface water, including the rivers, ponds,
of 4

lakes within the commonwealth and the sea adjacent to the commonwealth, and (iii) the water
beneath the surface of the earth within the commonwealth, including groundwater, springs, and
aquifers. Such geothermal energy shall include the electricity derived therefrom.
“Hot geothermal energy”, geothermal energy of more than 80 degrees Fahrenheit found
at depths of 10,000 feet or more in the earth .
“Waste Thermal Energy”, activities by humans that produce thermal energy as a
byproduct and include thermal energy from sources including, but not limited to, wastewater,
industrial sources, landfills, and data centers.
(b) It is hereby declared that ambient geothermal energy and anthropogenic geothermal
energy within the commonwealth as defined herein are a thermal commons held for the benefit
of the citizens of the commonwealth in public trust, except where found on property wholly
owned by private property owners or where produced wholly on private land, including but not
limited to waste thermal energy.
(c) To ensure that the commonwealth achieves its mandate to reduce greenhouse gas
emissions to net zero by the year 2050, the secretary of the executive office of energy and
environmental affairs shall establish a commission/working group to investigate and make
recommendations to the legislature for a comprehensive, equitable and efficient framework to
manage the opportunities presented to the commonwealth by the thermal energy transition from
combusting to non-combusting sources of thermal energy. Such commission shall be called the
Commission/Working Group for the Protection and Development of the Commonwealth’s
Thermal Energy Commons.
of 4

(d) The commission/working group shall consist of 20 members, including 1 person
representing each of the following: MAPC & other regional councils, energy efficiency experts,
thermal energy experts, utility experts, organized labor, EJ organization, AGO, DEP, DOER,
MassCEC, Executive office of economic development, and Massachusetts Bar Association with
expertise in land use. Interested parties shall apply to the secretary for designation as members.
The commissioner of the department of public utilities shall serve as chair of the
commission/working group.
(e) The commission/working group shall review available research and data and shall
define the scope of the thermal energy derived from the commons of the commonwealth. It shall
further solicit and consider relevant comments from stakeholders and shall develop
recommendations for legislative and regulatory changes to facilitate the protection and
development for the benefit of the citizens of the commonwealth the thermal commons, with due
consideration given to land use impacts and categorizations, water quality, soil health, and
restoration of and maintenance of the thermal stability of the commonwealth.The
commission/working group shall work with the executive office of energy and environmental
affairs to gather information and data to quantify how protection and development of the thermal
energy commons of the commonwealth may contribute to meeting the greenhouse gas emission
reductions requirements of chapter 21N. The recommendations of the commission/working
group shall include, but not be limited to, the following areas of proposed legislation or
regulation: (i) the extent of the thermal commons including but not limited to setbacks from the
boundaries of any private or public property, differences in usage requirements between
anthropogenic and non-anthropogenic ambient geothermal energy, (ii) any obligation to provide
essential energy service in return for a grant of access to the thermal commons, and the resulting
of 4

prioritization and regulatory framework of such thermal service; (iii) establish a reciprocal
obligation to serve the public in return for a grant of access to the thermal commons; (iv) to
establish regulatory priorities for such service to the public based on the provision of essential
energy services, safety, security, reliability, equity, emissions and affordability; (v) the scope of
permission for the drawdown of anthropogenic ambient geothermal energy, which shall not be
lower in annual average temperatures than experienced by the commonwealth in the year 1900;
(vi) the extent to which drawdown of anthropogenic geothermal energy shall be considered
restoration of the thermal commons and compensated for such restoration); (vii) to encourage
drawdown of anthropogenic geothermal energy as an ecosystem restoration: (viii) to ensure
annual stability of non-anthropogenic ambient geothermal energy through appropriate design and
management of the thermal commons.
(f) The commission/working group shall conduct no fewer than three public hearings in
conveniently accessible locations throughout the commonwealth. The executive office of energy
and environmental affairs shall provide administrative support for the operations of the
commission/working group. The commission/working group may retain independent expert
consultants.
(g) The commission/working group shall submit a report and recommendations, together
with any drafts of legislation that may be useful in carrying out its recommendations and
otherwise putting them into effect to the department of public utilities, the joint committee on
telecommunications, utilities and energy, the senate and house committees on global warming
and climate change and the clerks of the senate and house of representatives not later than July
31, 2026.
of 4